Illinois, session 104th, HB3122.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 2-101 and 2-105 as follows:  6    (40 ILCS 5/2-101)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 2-101)7    Sec. 2-101. Creation of system. A retirement system is 8created to provide retirement annuities, survivor's annuities 9and other benefits for certain members of the General 10Assembly, certain elected state officials, and their 11beneficiaries. 12    The system shall be known as the "General Assembly 13Retirement System". All its funds and property shall be a 14trust separate from all other entities, maintained for the 15purpose of securing payment of annuities and benefits under 16this Article. 17    Participation in the retirement system created under this 18Article by members of the General Assembly is restricted to 19persons who become participants before January 1, 2026. 20Beginning on that date, the System shall not accept any new 21participants who are members of the General Assembly. 22(Source: P.A. 83-1440.)   HB3122- 2 -LRB104 10025 RPS 20096 b1    (40 ILCS 5/2-105)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 2-105)2    Sec. 2-105. Member. "Member": Members of the General 3Assembly of this State, including persons who enter military 4service while a member of the General Assembly, and any person 5serving as Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, 6Treasurer, Comptroller, or Attorney General for the period of 7service in such office. 8    Any person who has served for 10 or more years as Clerk or 9Assistant Clerk of the House of Representatives, Secretary or 10Assistant Secretary of the Senate, or any combination thereof, 11may elect to become a member of this system while thenceforth 12engaged in such service by filing a written election with the 13board. Any person so electing shall be deemed an active member 14of the General Assembly for the purpose of validating and 15transferring any service credits earned under any of the funds 16and systems established under Articles 3 through 18 of this 17Code. 18    However, notwithstanding any other provision of this 19Article, a member of the General Assembly shall not be deemed a 20member for the purposes of this Article unless he or she became 21a participant of the System before January 1, 2026. 22(Source: P.A. 85-1008.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.